Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-715
Sections, how construed.

Insofar as the provisions of sections 3-701 to 3-716 are inconsistent with the provisions of any other act or of any city charter, if any, the provisions of sections 3-701 to 3-716 shall be controlling.

Laws 1969, c. 24, § 15, p. 217.